Utah statutes.
20A-7-102.   Initiatives and referenda authorized -- Restrictions.

By following the procedures and requirements of this chapter, Utah voters may, subject to the restrictions of Article VI, Sec. 1, Utah Constitution and this chapter:

(1)  initiate any desired legislation and cause it to be submitted to:

(a)  the Legislature or to a vote of the people for approval or rejection if it is a proposed state law; or

(b)  a local legislative body or to a vote of the people if it is a local law;

(2)  require any law passed by the Legislature, except those laws passed by a two-thirds vote of the members elected to each house of the Legislature, to be referred to the voters for their approval or rejection before the law takes effect; and

(3)  require any law or ordinance passed by a local legislative body to be referred to the voters for their approval or rejection before the law takes effect.



Amended by Chapter 272, 1994 General Session

